North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 48. Law-Enforcement Procedures in Delinquency Proceedings. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-594 through 7A-607.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For law enforcement procedures in delinquency proceedings under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-2100

et seq.